Florida, session 2026, SB1292.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 39 40 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 41 20.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 42 20.22âDepartment of Management Services.âThere is created a 43 Department of Management Services. 44 (2)âThe following divisions, programs, and services within 45 the Department of Management Services are established: 46 (b)âThe Florida Digital Service, which shall include the 47 Bureau of Enterprise Project Management and Oversight. 48 Section 2.âPresent subsections (24) through (38) of section 49 282.0041, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (25) 50 through (39), respectively, a new subsection (24) is added to 51 that section, and present subsections (27) and (29) of that 52 section are amended, to read: 53 282.0041âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 54 (24)ââMajor information technology systemâ means an 55 information technology system with a total cost of ownership of 56 $10 million or more which directly serves or impacts end users 57 in the delivery of constituent-facing services or which supports 58 mission-critical operations essential to a state agencyâs 59 statutory duties or core business functions. 60 (28)(27)ââProject oversightâ means an independent review 61 and assessment analysis of an information technology project 62 which that provides information on the projectâs scope, 63 completion timeframes, performance measurement, and budget and 64 which that identifies and quantifies issues or risks affecting 65 the successful and timely completion of the project. 66 (30)(29)ââRisk assessmentâ means the process of identifying 67 operational risks and security risks, determining their 68 magnitude, and identifying areas needing safeguards. 69 Section 3.âSection 282.0051, Florida Statutes, is amended 70 to read: 71 282.0051âDepartment of Management Services; Florida Digital 72 Service; powers, duties, and functions.â 73 (1)âThe Florida Digital Service is has been created within 74 the department to propose innovative solutions that securely 75 modernize state government, including technology and information 76 services, to achieve value through digital transformation and 77 interoperability, and to fully support the cloud-first policy as 78 specified in s. 282.206. The department, through the Florida 79 Digital Service, shall have the following powers, duties, and 80 functions: 81 (a)âDevelop and publish information technology policy for 82 the management of the stateâs information technology resources. 83 (b)âDevelop an enterprise architecture that: 84 1.âAcknowledges the unique needs of the entities within the 85 enterprise in the development and publication of standards and 86 terminologies to facilitate digital interoperability; 87 2.âSupports the cloud-first policy as specified in s. 88 282.206; and 89 3.âAddresses how information technology infrastructure may 90 be modernized to achieve cloud-first objectives. 91 (c)âEstablish project management and oversight standards 92 with which state agencies shall must comply when implementing 93 information technology projects. The department, acting through 94 the Florida Digital Service, shall update the provide training 95 opportunities to state agencies to assist in the adoption of the 96 project management and oversight standards at least once every 2 97 years, incorporating best practices from the public and private 98 sectors, as well as any lessons learned by state agencies. When 99 updating the standards, the Florida Digital Service shall 100 solicit input from all state agencies. To support data-driven 101 decisionmaking, the standards must include, but are not limited 102 to: 103 1.âPerformance measurements and metrics that objectively 104 assess reflect the progress and risks status of an information 105 technology project through performance baselines and monitoring 106 mechanisms to determine whether the project is performing as 107 planned and delivering the intended outcomes based on a defined 108 and documented project scope, cost, and schedule. 109 2.âMethodologies for calculating acceptable variances 110 between the planned and in the projected versus actual scope of 111 a technology project which provide clear thresholds to guide 112 corrective actions. Such methodologies must account for project 113 complexity and scale, schedule, performance, quality, and the or 114 cost of an information technology project. 115 3.âReporting requirements, including requirements designed 116 to alert all defined stakeholders when that an information 117 technology project has exceeded acceptable variances and when 118 specifying procedures for escalating critical issues to 119 appropriate individuals defined and documented in a project 120 plan. 121 4.âContent, format, and frequency of project updates. 122 5.âTechnical standards to ensure an information technology 123 project complies with the enterprise architecture, including 124 interoperability, security, scalability, and data management 125 requirements. 126 6.âMechanisms for engaging stakeholders throughout a 127 projectâs life cycle. 128 (d)âProvide training opportunities to state agencies 129 regarding the project management and oversight standards. 130 (e)(d)âPerform project oversight on all state agency 131 information technology projects that have total project costs of 132 $10 million or more and that are funded in the General 133 Appropriations Act or any other law. The department, acting 134 through the Florida Digital Service, shall report at least 135 quarterly to the Executive Office of the Governor, the President 136 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 137 on any information technology project that the Florida Digital 138 Service department identifies as high-risk due to the project 139 exceeding the acceptable project variance thresholds provided in 140 the project management and oversight standards ranges defined 141 and documented in a project plan. The report must include: 142 1.âA risk assessment, including fiscal risks, associated 143 with proceeding to the next stage of the project. 144 2.âRecommendations, and a recommendation for corrective 145 actions required, including suspension or termination of the 146 project. 147 3.âA list of all projects with a performance deficiency, 148 reported pursuant to s. 287.057(26)(d)1., which has not been 149 corrected by the vendor as of the end of the reporting period. 150 (f)(e)âIdentify opportunities for standardization and 151 consolidation of information technology services that support 152 interoperability and the cloud-first policy, as specified in s. 153 282.206, and business functions and operations, including 154 administrative functions such as purchasing, accounting and 155 reporting, cash management, and personnel, and that are common 156 across state agencies. The department, acting through the 157 Florida Digital Service, shall biennially on January 15 1 of 158 each odd-numbered even-numbered year provide recommendations for 159 standardization and consolidation to the Executive Office of the 160 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 161 House of Representatives. 162 (g)(f)âEstablish best practices for the procurement of 163 information technology products and cloud-computing services in 164 order to reduce costs, increase the quality of data center 165 services, or improve government services. 166 (h)(g)âDevelop standards for information technology reports 167 and updates, including, but not limited to, operational work 168 plans, project spend plans, and project status reports, for use 169 by state agencies. 170 (i)(h)âUpon request, assist state agencies in the 171 development of information technology-related legislative budget 172 requests. 173 (j)(i)âConduct annual assessments of state agencies to 174 determine compliance with all information technology standards 175 and guidelines developed and published by the department and 176 provide results of the assessments to the Executive Office of 177 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 178 the House of Representatives. 179 (j)âConduct a market analysis not less frequently than 180 every 3 years beginning in 2021 to determine whether the 181 information technology resources within the enterprise are 182 utilized in the most cost-effective and cost-efficient manner, 183 while recognizing that the replacement of certain legacy 184 information technology systems within the enterprise may be cost 185 prohibitive or cost inefficient due to the remaining useful life 186 of those resources; whether the enterprise is complying with the 187 cloud-first policy specified in s. 282.206; and whether the 188 enterprise is utilizing best practices with respect to 189 information technology, information services, and the 190 acquisition of emerging technologies and information services. 191 Each market analysis shall be used to prepare a strategic plan 192 for continued and future information technology and information 193 services for the enterprise, including, but not limited to, 194 proposed acquisition of new services or technologies and 195 approaches to the implementation of any new services or 196 technologies. Copies of each market analysis and accompanying 197 strategic plan must be submitted to the Executive Office of the 198 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 199 House of Representatives not later than December 31 of each year 200 that a market analysis is conducted. 201 (k)âRecommend other information technology services that 202 should be designed, delivered, and managed as enterprise 203 information technology services. Recommendations must include 204 the identification of existing information technology resources 205 associated with the services, if existing services must be 206 transferred as a result of being delivered and managed as 207 enterprise information technology services. The recommendations 208 must be submitted to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 209 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later than 210 January 15 of each odd-numbered year. 211 (l)âIn consultation with state agencies, propose a 212 methodology and approach for identifying and collecting both 213 current and planned information technology expenditure data at 214 the state agency level. 215 (m)1.âNotwithstanding any other law, provide project 216 oversight on any information technology project of the 217 Department of Financial Services, the Department of Legal 218 Affairs, and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 219 which has a total project cost of $20 million or more. Such 220 information technology projects must also comply with the 221 applicable information technology architecture, project 222 management and oversight, and reporting standards established by 223 the department, acting through the Florida Digital Service. 224 2.âWhen performing the project oversight function specified 225 in subparagraph 1., report at least quarterly to the Executive 226 Office of the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 227 Speaker of the House of Representatives on any information 228 technology project that the department, acting through the 229 Florida Digital Service, identifies as high-risk due to the 230 project exceeding the established acceptable project variance 231 thresholds ranges defined and documented in the project plan. 232 The report must shall include a risk assessment, including 233 fiscal risks, associated with proceeding to the next stage of 234 the project and a recommendation for corrective actions 235 required, including suspension or termination of the project. 236 (n)âIf an information technology project implemented by a 237 state agency must be connected to or otherwise accommodated by 238 an information technology system administered by the Department 239 of Financial Services, the Department of Legal Affairs, or the 240 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, consult with 241 these departments regarding the risks and other effects of such 242 projects on their information technology systems and work 243 cooperatively with these departments regarding the connections, 244 interfaces, timing, or accommodations required to implement such 245 projects. 246 (n)(o)âIf adherence to standards or policies adopted by or 247 established pursuant to this section causes conflict with 248 federal regulations or requirements imposed on an entity within 249 the enterprise and results in adverse action against an entity 250 or federal funding, work with the entity to provide alternative 251 standards, policies, or requirements that do not conflict with 252 the federal regulation or requirement. The department, acting 253 through the Florida Digital Service, shall annually report each 254 January 15 such alternative standards to the Executive Office of 255 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 256 the House of Representatives. 257 (o)(p)1.âEstablish an information technology policy for all 258 information technology-related state contracts, including state 259 term contracts for information technology commodities, 260 consultant services, and staff augmentation services. The 261 information technology policy must include: 262 a.âIdentification of the information technology product and 263 service categories to be included in state term contracts. 264 b.âRequirements to be included in solicitations for state 265 term contracts. 266 c.âEvaluation criteria for the award of information 267 technology-related state term contracts. 268 d.âThe term of each information technology-related state 269 term contract. 270 e.âThe maximum number of vendors authorized on each state 271 term contract. 272 f.âAt a minimum, a requirement that any contract for 273 information technology commodities or services meet the National 274 Institute of Standards and Technology Cybersecurity Framework. 275 g.âFor an information technology project wherein project 276 oversight is required pursuant to paragraph (e) (d) or paragraph 277 (m), a requirement that independent verification and validation 278 be employed throughout the project life cycle with the primary 279 objective of independent verification and validation being to 280 provide an objective assessment of products and processes 281 throughout the project life cycle. An entity providing 282 independent verification and validation may not have technical, 283 managerial, or financial interest in the project and may not 284 have responsibility for, or participate in, any other aspect of 285 the project. 286 2.âEvaluate vendor responses for information technology 287 related state term contract solicitations and invitations to 288 negotiate. 289 3.âAnswer vendor questions on information technology 290 related state term contract solicitations. 291 4.âEnsure that the information technology policy 292 established pursuant to subparagraph 1. is included in all 293 solicitations and contracts that are administratively executed 294 by the department. 295 (p)(q)âRecommend potential methods for standardizing data 296 across state agencies which will promote interoperability and 297 reduce the collection of duplicative data. 298 (q)(r)âRecommend open data technical standards and 299 terminologies for use by the enterprise. 300 (r)(s)âEnsure that enterprise information technology 301 solutions are capable of utilizing an electronic credential and 302 comply with the enterprise architecture standards. 303 (s)âReview all state agency information technology 304 legislative budget requests to identify compliance issues 305 related to the enterprise architecture, project planning 306 standards, and cybersecurity. 307 (t)âIdentify efficiency opportunities in the use of 308 information technology resources. 309 (u)âSubmit recommendations for improvement or any statutory 310 changes necessary to implement the improvements to the Governor, 311 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 312 Representatives no later than November 15 of each year. 313 (v)âDevelop and publish, in collaboration with the 314 enterprise, a data dictionary for each agency that reflects the 315 nomenclature in the comprehensive indexed data catalog. 316 (w)âEach December 1, compile an enterprise report of major 317 information technology systems approaching end-of-life within 5 318 fiscal years after such December 1, and submit the report to the 319 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 320 House of Representatives. For purposes of this paragraph, the 321 term âend-of-lifeâ means the point at which an information 322 technology resource no longer receives vendor support, uses 323 obsolete technology, cannot be adequately maintained, or fails 324 to meet enterprise architecture standards. The report must: 325 1.âDescribe each major information technology system, 326 including its primary functions, user base, and dependencies 327 with other systems. 328 2.âProvide the age, projected end-of-life date, technology 329 platform, and vendor support status of such system. 330 3.âIdentify the risks to operations, service delivery, or 331 cybersecurity if such system reaches end-of-life without 332 replacement. 333 4.âDescribe the plan for such systemâs replacement, 334 modernization, or retirement. 335 (2)(a)âThe Secretary of Management Services shall designate 336 a state chief information officer, who shall administer the 337 Florida Digital Service. The state chief information officer, 338 prior to appointment, must have at least 5 years of experience 339 in the development of information system strategic planning and 340 development or information technology policy, and, preferably, 341 have leadership-level experience in the design, development, and 342 deployment of interoperable software and data solutions. 343 (b)âThe state chief information officer, in consultation 344 with the Secretary of Management Services, shall designate a 345 state chief data officer. The chief data officer must be a 346 proven and effective administrator who must have significant and 347 substantive experience in data management, data governance, 348 interoperability, and security. 349 (3)âThe department, acting through the Florida Digital 350 Service and from funds appropriated to the Florida Digital 351 Service, shall: 352 (a)âCreate, not later than December 1, 2022, and maintain a 353 comprehensive indexed data catalog in collaboration with the 354 enterprise that lists the data elements housed within the 355 enterprise and the legacy system or application in which these 356 data elements are located. The data catalog must, at a minimum, 357 specifically identify all data that is restricted from public 358 disclosure based on federal or state laws and regulations and 359 require that all such information be protected in accordance 360 with s. 282.318. 361 (4)âThe Florida Digital Service shall manage all 362 independent verification and validation contracts for state 363 agencies entered into or amended on or after July 1, 2026. 364 (b)âDevelop and publish, not later than December 1, 2022, 365 in collaboration with the enterprise, a data dictionary for each 366 agency that reflects the nomenclature in the comprehensive 367 indexed data catalog. 368 (c)âAdopt, by rule, standards that support the creation and 369 deployment of an application programming interface to facilitate 370 integration throughout the enterprise. 371 (d)âAdopt, by rule, standards necessary to facilitate a 372 secure ecosystem of data interoperability that is compliant with 373 the enterprise architecture. 374 (e)âAdopt, by rule, standards that facilitate the 375 deployment of applications or solutions to the existing 376 enterprise system in a controlled and phased approach. 377 (f)âAfter submission of documented use cases developed in 378 conjunction with the affected agencies, assist the affected 379 agencies with the deployment, contingent upon a specific 380 appropriation therefor, of new interoperable applications and 381 solutions: 382 1.âFor the Department of Health, the Agency for Health Care 383 Administration, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the 384 Department of Education, the Department of Elderly Affairs, and 385 the Department of Children and Families. 386 2.âTo support military members, veterans, and their 387 families. 388 (5)(4)âFor information technology projects that have a 389 total project cost of $10 million or more, the Florida Digital 390 Service shall: 391 (a)âNo later than January 1, 2027, establish a 392 presolicitation planning framework that includes standards, 393 procedures, forms, and guidance that state agencies shall follow 394 before issuing a competitive solicitation must provide the 395 Florida Digital Service with written notice of any planned 396 procurement of an information technology project. 397 (b)âThe Florida Digital Service must Participate in the 398 development of specifications and recommend modifications to any 399 planned procurement of an information technology project by 400 state agencies so that the procurement complies with the 401 enterprise architecture and the presolicitation planning 402 framework. 403 (c)âCertify that a state agency has complied with the 404 presolicitation planning framework and is ready to initiate the 405 planned procurement. The Florida Digital Service shall withhold 406 certification for any project that does not comply with the 407 established presolicitation planning framework. 408 (d)(c)âThe Florida Digital Service must Participate in 409 post-award contract monitoring, including risk oversight and 410 monitoring for issues or situations that should be elevated to 411 ensure timely resolution of the issue or situation. 412 (6)(5)âThe department, acting through the Florida Digital 413 Service, may not retrieve or disclose any data without a shared 414 data agreement in place between the Florida Digital Service 415 department and the enterprise entity that has primary custodial 416 responsibility of, or data-sharing responsibility for, that 417 data. The Florida Digital Service shall report to the Governor, 418 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 419 Representatives each January 15 any failure to reach a shared 420 data agreement with a state agency that prevents the Florida 421 Digital Service from fulfilling its duties and responsibilities. 422 (7)(6)âThe department, acting through the Florida Digital 423 Service, shall adopt rules: 424 (a)âTo administer this section. 425 (b)âTo support the creation and deployment of an 426 application programming interface to facilitate integration 427 throughout the enterprise. 428 (c)âNecessary to facilitate a secure ecosystem of data 429 interoperability which is compliant with the enterprise 430 architecture. 431 (d)âTo facilitate the deployment of applications or 432 solutions to the existing enterprise system in a controlled and 433 phased approach. 434 Section 4.âSection 282.00513, Florida Statutes, is created 435 to read: 436 282.00513âBureau of Enterprise Project Management and 437 Oversight; duties.â 438 (1)âThere is created a Bureau of Enterprise Project 439 Management and Oversight within the Florida Digital Service, 440 which shall: 441 (a)âOversee the procurement of information technology 442 commodities and services by state agencies. 443 (b)âOversee the performance of vendors under information 444 technology contracts for commodities or services entered into by 445 state agencies. 446 (c)âDevelop a framework that provides processes, 447 activities, and deliverables state agencies must comply with 448 when planning an information technology project. The processes, 449 activities, and deliverables must include, but are not limited 450 to, all of the following: 451 1.âBusiness case development. The business case development 452 must include the information required by s. 287.0571(4), full 453 life cycle cost estimates, governance structure, system 454 interoperability goals, data management plans, scalability 455 approach, evaluation of cybersecurity and data privacy risks, 456 and technology-specific performance metrics and service levels. 457 2.âMarket research, including the use of a request for 458 information as defined in s. 287.012. 459 3.âPlanning and scheduling. 460 4.âStakeholder engagement. 461 5.âRisk assessment. 462 6.âProcurement strategy. 463 7.âProject governance definition. 464 8.âSystem design and requirements. 465 9.âChange management. 466 10.âMonitoring and reporting. 467 11.âPostimplementation review and planning. 468 12.âSolicitation documentation. 469 (d)âDevelop on or before January 1, 2027, forms for state 470 agencies to use to evaluate and report the performance of 471 information technology vendors in the delivery of information 472 technology commodities or services. 473 (e)âDevelop trainings specific to information technology 474 which supplement and enhance the trainings offered by the 475 department and the Chief Financial Officer under s. 476 287.057(15)(b). The bureau shall evaluate such training every 2 477 years to assess its effectiveness and update the training 478 curriculum. The training must be designed to: 479 1.âAddress the unique requirements and risk profiles of 480 state information technology projects, procurements, contract 481 management, and vendor management. 482 2.âImprove the technical understanding of the job 483 requirements, certifications, and skill sets required by state 484 agencies recruiting individuals for information technology 485 roles. 486 (2)âThe state chief information officer, in consultation 487 with the Secretary of Management Services, shall designate a 488 chief of the Bureau of Enterprise Project Management and 489 Oversight. The chief must have demonstrable experience in the 490 governance of large-scale public sector information technology 491 initiatives and portfolios, negotiation and management of 492 information technology contracts, modular contracting and 493 delivery, and performance management. 494 Section 5.âSection 282.00514, Florida Statutes, is created 495 to read: 496 282.00514âDuties of state agencies.â 497 (1)âState agencies shall include the information technology 498 policy adopted pursuant to s. 282.0051(1)(o) in all 499 solicitations and contracts for information technology 500 commodities or services. 501 (2)âState agencies shall follow the processes and use the 502 forms developed by the Bureau of Enterprise Project Management 503 and Oversight to evaluate and report the performance of 504 information technology vendors in the delivery of information 505 technology commodities or services. 506 (3)âIf an information technology project implemented by a 507 state agency must be connected to or otherwise accommodated by 508 an information technology system administered by the Department 509 of Financial Services, the Department of Legal Affairs, or the 510 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Florida 511 Digital Service must consult with these departments regarding 512 the risks and other effects of such projects on their 513 information technology systems and work cooperatively with these 514 departments regarding the connections, interfaces, timing, or 515 accommodations required to implement such projects. 516 (4)âFor information technology projects that have a total 517 project cost of $10 million or more, state agencies shall: 518 (a)âProvide the Florida Digital Service with written notice 519 of any planned procurement of an information technology project, 520 the proposed scope, the project specifications, and the project 521 business case at least 90 days before the planned publication 522 date of the competitive solicitation. 523 (b)âReceive certification by the Florida Digital Service 524 that the project planning complies with the presolicitation 525 planning framework established by the Florida Digital Service 526 before any competitive solicitation related to an information 527 technology project may be issued. 528 (c)âProvide the Florida Digital Service all information 529 necessary for the Florida Digital Service to fulfill its project 530 oversight responsibilities. 531 (5)âState agencies shall provide the information required 532 to complete the report in s. 282.0051(1)(w) in a format and 533 manner prescribed by the Florida Digital Service and shall 534 certify that the information provided is accurate and complete 535 to the best of their knowledge as of the submission date. 536 Section 6.âSubsections (1) and (3) and paragraph (b) of 537 subsection (4) of section 282.00515, Florida Statutes, are 538 amended to read: 539 282.00515âDuties of Cabinet agencies.â 540 (1)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 541 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 542 Consumer Services shall adopt the standards established in s. 543 282.0051(1)(b), (c), and (q) and (7)(d) s. 282.0051(1)(b), (c), 544 and (r) and (3)(e) or adopt alternative standards based on best 545 practices and industry standards that allow for open data 546 interoperability. 547 (3)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 548 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 549 Consumer Services may contract with the Florida Digital Service 550 department to provide or perform any of the services and 551 functions described in s. 282.0051. 552 (4) 553 (b)âThe department, acting through the Florida Digital 554 Service, may not retrieve or disclose any data without a shared 555 data agreement in place between the Florida Digital Service 556 department and the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department 557 of Financial Services, or the Department of Agriculture and 558 Consumer Services. 559 Section 7.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (26) of 560 section 287.057, Florida Statutes, to read: 561 287.057âProcurement of commodities or contractual 562 services.â 563 (26) 564 (e)âThe department shall maintain a centralized repository 565 of vendor performance records developed by the continuing 566 oversight teams for information technology services contracts. 567 Section 8.âSection 287.0583, Florida Statutes, is created 568 to read: 569 287.0583âContract requirements for information technology 570 commodities or services.âA contract for information technology 571 commodities or services involving the development, 572 customization, implementation, integration, support or 573 maintenance of software systems, applications, platforms, or 574 related services must ensure the following: 575 (1)âAny data created, processed, or maintained under the 576 contract is portable and can be extracted in a machine-readable 577 format upon request. 578 (2)âThe vendor will provide, upon request, comprehensive 579 operational documentation sufficient to allow continued 580 operation and maintenance by the agency or a new vendor. 581 (3)âThe vendor will provide, upon request, reasonable 582 assistance and support during a transition to the agency or to a 583 new vendor. 584 (4)âAll anticipated software license fees, license renewal 585 fees, and operation and maintenance costs are documented in 586 detail. If exact figures are not feasible, the vendor must 587 provide a reasonable cost range. 588 Section 9.âSection 287.0591, Florida Statutes, is amended 589 to read: 590 287.0591âInformation technology competitive solicitations 591 and state term contracts; vendor performance disqualification.â 592 (1)(a)âAny competitive solicitation issued by the 593 department for a state term contract for information technology 594 commodities must include a term that does not exceed 48 months. 595 (b)(2)âAny competitive solicitation issued by the 596 department for a state term contract for information technology 597 consultant services or information technology staff augmentation 598 contractual services must include a term that does not exceed 48 599 months. 600 (c)(3)âThe department may execute a state term contract for 601 information technology commodities, consultant services, or 602 staff augmentation contractual services that exceeds the 48 603 month requirement if the Secretary of Management Services and 604 the state chief information officer certify in writing to the 605 Executive Office of the Governor that a longer contract term is 606 in the best interest of the state. 607 (2)(4)âIf the department issues a competitive solicitation 608 for information technology commodities, consultant services, or 609 staff augmentation contractual services, The Florida Digital 610 Service within the department shall participate in such 611 competitive solicitations for information technology 612 commodities, consultant services, or staff augmentation 613 contractual services issued by the department, which must 614 include reviewing the solicitation specifications to verify 615 compliance with enterprise architecture and cybersecurity 616 standards, evaluating vendor responses under established 617 criteria, answering vendor questions, and providing any other 618 technical expertise necessary. 619 (3)(a)(5)âIf an agency issues a request for quote to 620 purchase information technology commodities, information 621 technology consultant services, or information technology staff 622 augmentation contractual services from the state term contract 623 that meets the CATEGORY TWO threshold amount, but is less than 624 the CATEGORY FOUR threshold amount: 625 1.âFor any contract with 25 approved vendors or fewer, the 626 agency must issue a request for quote to all vendors approved to 627 provide such commodity or service. 628 2.âFor any contract with more than 25 approved vendors, the 629 agency must issue a request for quote to at least 25 of the 630 vendors approved to provide such commodity or contractual 631 service. 632 (b)âThe agency shall maintain a copy of the request for 633 quote, the identity of the vendor that was sent the request for 634 quote, and any vendor response to the request for quote for 2 635 years after the date of issuance of the purchase order. 636 (c)âUse of a request for quote does not constitute a 637 decision or intended decision that is subject to protest under 638 s. 120.57(3). 639 (4)(a)âAn agency issuing a request for quote to purchase 640 information technology commodities, information technology 641 consultant services, or information technology staff 642 augmentation contractual services from the state term contract 643 which exceeds the CATEGORY FOUR threshold amount shall publish 644 on a searchable and publicly available system of record 645 maintained by the department: 646 1.âThe request for quote for a minimum of 10 days before 647 executing a purchase order. 648 2.âThe name of the vendor awarded the purchase order. 649 (b)âThe agency shall maintain a copy of the request for 650 quote, the identity of the vendor that was sent the request for 651 quote, and any vendor responses to the request for quote for 2 652 years after the date of issuance of the purchase order. 653 (c)âUse of a request for quote does not constitute a 654 decision or intended decision that is subject to protest under 655 s. 120.57(3). 656 (5)âAgencies issuing a competitive solicitation to purchase 657 information technology services shall consult the repository of 658 vendor performance records developed under s. 287.057(26)(e), 659 and consider any relevant records when evaluating vendor 660 responses to the competitive solicitation. 661 (6)âTo the extent practicable, an agencyâs contract for the 662 procurement of a major information technology system must be 663 divided into increments that: 664 (a)âAddress complex information technology objectives 665 incrementally to enhance the likelihood of attaining those 666 objectives. 667 (b)âProvide for delivery, implementation, and testing of 668 workable systems or solutions in discrete increments, each of 669 which comprises a system or solution that is not dependent on a 670 subsequent increment in order to perform its principal 671 functions. 672 (c)âProvide an opportunity for subsequent increments of the 673 acquisition to take advantage of any evolution in technology or 674 needs that occur during the implementation of earlier 675 increments. 676 (7)(a)(6)âBeginning October 1, 2021, and Each October 1 677 thereafter, the department shall prequalify firms and 678 individuals to provide information technology staff augmentation 679 contractual services and information technology commodities on 680 state term contract. 681 (b)âIn order to prequalify a firm or individual for 682 participation on the state term contract, the department shall 683 must consider, at a minimum, the capability, experience, and 684 past performance record of the firm or individual. 685 (c)âA firm or individual removed from the source of supply 686 pursuant to s. 287.042(1)(b) or placed on a disqualified vendor 687 list pursuant to s. 287.133 or s. 287.134 is immediately 688 disqualified from state term contract eligibility. 689 (d)âOnce a firm or individual has been prequalified to 690 provide information technology staff augmentation contractual 691 services or information technology commodities on state term 692 contract, the firm or individual may respond to requests for 693 quotes from an agency to provide such services. 694 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.